Louisiana, session 2026, SB200.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 29:43 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§43. Protection of military bases; prohibited ownership of immovable property
by foreign adversaries and agents of foreign adversaries
A. The legislature hereby declares it is the policy of this state that
ownership of immovable property in proximity to military bases by foreign
adversaries or agents of foreign adversaries presents a threat to public health
and safety that warrants reasonable statutory restrictions and the reasonable
exercise of the constitutional police powers of the state.
B. Any immovable property that is purchased, leased, possessed, owned,
held in interest, or in any manner under the control of a foreign adversary or
an agent or mandatory of a foreign adversary that is located within fifty miles
of a military base may be expropriated by the Military Department, state of
Louisiana, regardless of the date that the immovable property was acquired.
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 200 ENROLLED
C. If the Military Department, state of Louisiana, files a petition to
expropriate against immovable property pursuant to Subsection B of this
Section, the expropriation shall be filed and conducted in the same manner and
by the same method provided for in Part I of Title 19 of the Louisiana Revised
Statutes of 1950, except that the petition shall also contain all of the following:
(1) A statement demonstrating compliance with the requirements of this
Section.
(2) A statement detailing the description and nature of the threat to
public health and safety that will be removed by the expropriation.
D. Property acquisitions conducted pursuant to this Section shall be
subject to the provisions of R.S. 38:3101 et seq.
E.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of this Section to the contrary, any
foreign adversary or any agent or mandatary of a foreign adversary, as defined
in this Section, that owns or holds any immovable property subject to the
provisions of Subsection (B) of this Section may, prior to the final judgement of
expropriation, voluntarily divest itself of such property by bona fide sale,
transfer, or conveyance to a natural person or juridical person that is not a
foreign adversary and is not an agent or mandatary of a foreign adversary.
(2) Upon completion of a valid transfer of the immovable property in
accordance with this Paragraph, the Military Department, state of Louisiana
shall notify the court that the property shall no longer be subject to
expropriation under this Section and the court shall dismiss the suit, provided
that the transferee is not acting, directly or indirectly, on behalf of or under the
direction or control of a foreign adversary.
F. Notwithstanding any provision of this Section to the contrary, no
immovable or movable property shall be taken, damaged, or expropriated by
the state or any of its political subdivisions pursuant to this Section except in
accordance with Louisiana Constitution Article I, Section 4, which requires that
property shall not be taken or damaged except for public purposes and with just
compensation paid to the owner. Therefore, any expropriation authorized
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 200 ENROLLED
herein shall be conditioned upon the payment of just compensation to the full
extent of the owner’s loss and no transfer of ownership shall be effective until
such compensation has been paid.
G. Unless otherwise indicated, the following definitions shall apply to this
Section:
(1) "Agent of a foreign adversary" or "mandatary of a foreign
adversary" means a juridical person or a natural person that serves as a
mandatary, as provided in Louisiana Civil Code Article 2989, for a principal
that is a foreign adversary and meets one or more of the following criteria:
(a) Is under direction of a foreign adversary that has the power to direct
or cause the direction of the management or policies of the juridical person
whether through ownership of securities, by contract, or otherwise.
(b) Directly or indirectly has the right to vote fifty percent or more of the
voting interests of an entity that is owned or controlled by a foreign adversary
or is entitled to fifty percent or more of its profits and is, therefore, presumed
to have the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies
of the juridical person.
(c) Is a juridical person that meets any of the following:
(i) Is headquartered in a country identified as a foreign adversary.
(ii) Is held or controlled, either directly or indirectly, by a government
of a foreign adversary.
(iii) Is owned by, or the majority of stock or other ownership interest is
held or controlled by, any person who is a citizen of a foreign adversary, unless
that person is a legal permanent resident of the United States.
(d) Is a juridical person or a subsidiary that is owned by, or the majority
of stock or other ownership interest of which is held or controlled by, a
corporation or entity described in Subparagraph (c) of this Paragraph.
(e) Any individual person who is a citizen of a foreign adversary, unless
that person is a legal permanent resident of the United States and does not
otherwise meet any of the criteria provided in Subparagraphs (a) through (d)
Page 3 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 200 ENROLLED
of this Paragraph.
(2) "Foreign adversary" means any foreign government or foreign
nongovernmental person determined by the United States secretary of
commerce to have engaged in a long-term pattern or serious instances of
conduct significantly adverse to the national security of the United States or
security and safety of United States persons as listed in 15 CFR 791.4
(Determination of Foreign Adversaries), as amended or renumbered, and
identified in the database maintained by the United States Department of the
Treasury, Office of Foreign Assets Control.
(3) "Military base" means any of the following immovable properties:
(a) A military base or facility, reservation, camp, post, base, installation,
armory, or training area and any weather station operated by the armed forces
of the United States.
(b) A military base, facility, reservation, camp, post, installation, armory,
or training area that is operated by the state military.
(c) Any facility operated by the Civil Air Patrol.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.